Washington statutes.
RCW 19.285.045

Energy conservation and renewable energy targets—Analysis and advisory opinion.

(1) When requested by a consumer-owned qualifying utility or by a person proposing an electric generation project or conservation resource, the department is authorized to and shall provide analysis and an advisory opinion on whether a proposed electric generation project or conservation resource qualifies to meet a target under RCW 19.285.040. The advisory opinion must include a legal analysis. When forming its advisory opinion, the department must: (a) Consider, and may rely on, previous opinions issued by the I-937 technical working group established by the commission and the department; and (b) solicit and consider comments from interested parties, including staff of the requesting utility. The department must give priority to any application regarding an electric generation project or conservation resource that previously received an affirmative advisory opinion from the I-937 technical working group.

(2) Consumer-owned qualifying utilities and persons proposing electric generation projects or conservation resources may apply for an advisory opinion from the department. The application must be in writing and must include information that accurately describes the proposed project or resource. Within ninety days of receiving an application, the director of the department must issue a signed advisory opinion on whether the proposed project or resource qualifies to meet a target under RCW 19.285.040. The governing board of the consumer-owned utility that will use the resource or project must either adopt or reject the advisory opinion after public notice and hearing. Under its responsibilities in RCW 19.285.060, the auditor shall consider any project or resource reviewed and adopted under the process in this section as being in compliance with RCW 19.285.040 and 19.285.060, but only if: (a) The advisory opinion affirmatively qualifies the project or resource; (b) the governing board of the consumer-owned utility that will use the project or resource adopts the advisory opinion after public notice and hearing; and (c) the project or resource is built or acquired as proposed.

(3) The department may require an applicant to pay an application fee to cover the cost of reviewing the project and preparing an advisory opinion.

(4) An electric generation project reviewed and adopted under this section may produce renewable energy credits as defined in RCW 19.285.030.

(5) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.

(6) Nothing in this section preempts the authority of any governing board of a consumer-owned utility from making a determination, independent of the process in this section, on whether a proposed electric generation project or conservation resource may qualify to meet a target under RCW 19.285.040.

[ 2012 c 254 s 1.]